de: Gesundheit & Schönheit > Gesundheitspflege > Medizinische Messgeräte: Aktivitätsmonitore; Blutzuckermessgeräte; Blutdruckmessgeräte; Körperfettanalyse; Personenwaagen; Atemalkoholmessgerät-Zubehör; Alkoholmessgeräte; Cholesterinmessgeräte; Fruchtbarkeitsmonitore & Ovulationstests; Herzfrequenzmesser; Fieberthermometer; Pränatale Herzfrequenzmesser; Pulsoximeter
sl-SI: Zdravje in lepota > Zdravje > Biometrični monitorji: Monitorji dejavnosti; Merilniki glukoze v krvi; Merilniki krvnega tlaka; Analizatorji telesne sestave; Tehtnice za merjenje telesne teže; Dodatki za alkoteste; Alkotesti; Merilniki holesterola v krvi; Monitorji za ugotavljanje plodnosti in ovulacijski testi; Merilniki srčnega utripa; Medicinski termometri; Merilniki srčnega utripa zarodka; Pulzni oksimetri
es: Salud y belleza > Cuidado de la salud > Dispositivos biométricos: Monitores de actividad; Medidores de glucosa en sangre; Monitores de presión sanguínea; Analizadores de grasa corporal; Básculas de peso corporal; Accesorios de alcoholímetro; Alcoholímetro; Analizadores de colesterol; Tests de ovulación y monitores de fertilidad; Monitores de frecuencia cardíaca; Termómetros médicos; Monitores de escucha de latidos fetales; Pulsioxímetros
sk-SK: Zdravie a krása > Starostlivosť o zdravie > Biometrické monitory: Monitory aktivity; Krvné glukomery; Tlakomery; Analyzátory telesného tuku; Osobné váhy; Príslušenstvo k alkoholtesterom; Dychové analyzátory; Analyzátory cholesterolu; Monitory plodnosti a ovulačné testy; Monitory srdcovej frekvencie; Zdravotnícke teplomery; Prenatálne monitory srdcovej frekvencie; Pulzné oxymetre
zh-TW: 保健與美容 > 健康照護 > 生物識別監測: 活動監測工具; 血糖儀; 血壓監測器; 體脂分析儀; 體重計; 酒測儀配件; 酒測器; 膽固醇分析儀; 排卵檢測用品; 心率監測器; 醫療溫度計; 產前心率監測儀; 脈搏血氧飽和度分析儀
nb: Skjønnhet og helse > Helsestell > Biometriske overvåkningsapparater: Aktivitetsovervåkere; Blodsukkermålere; Blodtrykksmålere; Kroppsfettanalysatorer; Kroppsvekter; Promilletester tilbehør; Promillemålere; Kolesterolmålere; Fertilitetsmonitorer og eggløsningstestere; Hjertefrekvensmålere; Medisinske termometere; Ultralydsmonitorer; Pulsoksimetere
ro-RO: Sănătate și frumusețe > Îngrijirea sănătății > Monitoare biometrice: Monitoare pentru activitate; Glucometre; Monitoare pentru tensiunea arterială; Analizoare pentru grăsimea corporală; Cântare pentru greutate corporală; Accesorii pentru etilotest; Etiloteste; Analizoare pentru colesterol; Monitoare pentru fertilitate și teste de ovulație; Monitoare de ritm cardiac; Termometre medicale; Monitor pentru ritm cardiac fetal; Pulsoximetre
ja: 美容・健康 > ヘルスケア > 医療用測定器: アクティビティ モニター; 血糖値測定器; 血圧計; 体脂肪計; 体重計; アルコール検知器用アクセサリー; アルコール検知器; コレステロール検査器; 排卵測定器・検査薬; 心拍計; 医療用体温計; 胎児心音モニター; パルスオキシメーター
bg-BG: Здраве и красота > Грижа за здравето > Биометрични монитори: Монитори за активност; Глюкомери; Апарати за кръвно налягане; Анализатори на телесни мазнини; Везни за телесно тегло; Аксесоари за дрегер; Алкотестери; Анализатори на холестерола; Монитори за фертилност и тестове за овулация; Монитори за сърдечен ритъм; Медицински термометри; Фетални доплери; Пулсикометри
th: สุขภาพและความงาม > การดูแลสุขภาพ > เครื่องตรวจวัดชีวมิติ: เครื่องตรวจวัดกิจกรรม; เครื่องวัดกลูโคสในเลือด; เครื่องวัดความดันโลหิต; อุปกรณ์วิเคราะห์ไขมัน; เครื่องชั่งน้ำหนักร่างกาย; อุปกรณ์เสริมเครื่องตระหนกสุรา; เครื่องวัดปริมาณแอลกอฮอล์จากลมหายใจ; อุปกรณ์วิเคราะห์คอเลสเตอรอล; เครื่องตรวจสอบภาวะเจริญพันธุ์และการทดสอบการตกไข่; เครื่องวัดอัตราการเต้นของหัวใจ; เทอร์มอมิเตอร์ทางการแพทย์; อุปกรณ์ตรวจจับอัตราการเต้นของหัวใจก่อนคลอด; เครื่องวัดออกซิเจนในเลือดและชีพจร
da: Sundhed og skønhed > Sundhedspleje > Biometriske målere: Aktivitetsmålere; Blodsukkermålere; Blodtryksmålere; Test af kropsfedt; Badevægte; Alkometertilbehør; Ballontest; Kolesteroltest; Fertilitetsmonitorer og ægløsningstests; Pulsmålere; Medicinske termometre; Fosterhjertelydsmålere; Pulsoximetre
cs: Zdraví a krása > Zdravotní péče > Měřiče tělesných funkcí: Měřiče aktivity; Glukometry; Měřiče krevního tlaku; Analyzátory tělesného tuku; Osobní váhy; Příslušenství k alkohol testerům; Analyzátory dechu; Měřiče cholesterolu; Sledování plodných dnů a testování ovulace; Měřiče srdeční frekvence; Lékařské teploměry; Prenatální odposlechy; Pulzní oxymetry
ru: Красота и здоровье > Медицинские товары > Инструменты для измерения биометрических показателей: Мониторы активности; Глюкометры; Тонометры; Определители жировых отложений; Напольные весы; Аксессуары для алкотестеров; Индикаторные трубки; Анализаторы холестерина; Мониторы фертильности и тесты на овуляцию; Мониторы сердечного ритма; Медицинские термометры; Фетальные допплеры; Пульсоксиметры
hu: Egészség és szépség > Egészségügyi ellátás > Biometrikus figyelők: Tevékenységfigyelők; Vércukormérők; Vérnyomásmérők; Testzsír-elemzők; Testsúlymérlegek; Alkoholszonda-kiegészítők; Alkoholmérők; Koleszterinelemzők; Termékenységi figyelők és ovulációs tesztek; Pulzusmérők; Orvosi hőmérők; Terhességi szívverésfigyelők; Pulzoximéterek
vi: Sức khỏe và sắc đẹp > Chăm sóc sức khỏe > Thiết bị theo dõi sinh trắc học: Theo dõi hoạt động; Máy đo đường huyết; Thiết bị đo huyết áp; Thiết bị phân tích mỡ cơ thể; Cân sức khỏe; Phụ kiện máy đo nồng độ cồn; Máy đo nồng độ cồn trong hơi thở; Thiết bị phân tích cholesterol; Que thử rụng trứng và máy theo dõi thời kỳ rụng trứng; Máy đo nhịp tim; Nhiệt kế y tế; Máy theo dõi nhịp tim thai nhi; Máy đo nồng độ bão hòa oxy trong máu
pt-BR: Saúde e beleza > Cuidados com a saúde > Monitores biométricos: Monitores de atividade; Medidores de glicose; Monitores de pressão; Analisadores de gordura; Balanças de banheiro; Acessórios para bafômetro; Bafômetro; Analisadores de colesterol; Testes de ovulação e monitores de fertilidade; Monitores de frequência cardíaca; Termômetros médicos; Monitores cardíacos para pré-natal; Oxímetros de pulso
ko: 건강/미용 > 건강 관리 > 생체신호 모니터: 생체신호 감지기; 혈당 측정기; 혈압 측정기; 체지방 분석기; 체중계; 음주 측정기 액세서리; 음주 측정기; 콜레스테롤 분석기; 배란 주기 검사기; 심박수 모니터; 의료용 체온계; 태아 심박 측정기; 산소포화도 측정기
sv: Skönhet och hälsa > Hälsovård > Biometrimätare: Aktivitetsmätare; Blodglykosmätare; Blodtrycksmätare; Kroppsfettanalyserare; Personvågar; Alkoholmätartillbehör; Alkotestapparater; Kolesterolanalyserare; Fertilitetsmonitorer och ägglossningstest; Hjärtfrekvensmätare; Medicinska termometrar; Prenatal hjärtövervakning; Pulsoximetrar
pt-PT: Saúde e beleza > Cuidados de saúde > Dispositivos de monitorização biométrica: Dispositivos de monitorização de atividade; Dispositivos de medição de glicose no sangue; Dispositivos de monitorização de pressão arterial; Analisadores de gordura corporal; Balanças de peso corporal; Acessórios para alcoolímetros; Alcoolímetros; Analisadores de colesterol; Testes de ovulação e monitorização de fertilidade; Monitores de frequência cardíaca; Termómetros médicos; Monitores de batimento cardíaco pré-natal; Oxímetros de pulso
lt-LT: Sveikata ir grožis > Sveikatos priežiūra > Biometriniai monitoriai: Aktyvumo monitoriai; Gliukozės kiekio kraujyje matuokliai; Kraujo spaudimo monitoriai; Kūno riebalų analizatoriai; Kūno svorio svarstyklės; Alkotesterio priedai; Alkotesteriai; Cholesterolio analizatoriai; Vaisingumo monitoriai ir ovuliacijos testai; Širdies ritmo monitoriai; Medicininiai termometrai; Prenataliniai širdies ritmo monitoriai; Pulso oksimetrai
nl: Gezondheid en persoonlijke verzorging > Gezondheidszorg > Biometrische meters: Activiteitsmeters; Bloedglucosemeters; Bloeddrukmeters; Apparaten voor lichaamsvetanalyse; Badkamerweegschalen; Blaastest accessoires; Ademanalyseapparaten; Cholesterolanalyseapparaten; Vruchtbaarheidsmonitors en ovulatietests; Hartslagmonitors; Medische thermometers; Hartslagmonitors voor prenatale zorg; Pulse-oxymeters
hr-HR: Zdravlje i ljepota > Briga za zdravlje > Biometrijski monitori: Uređaji za praćenje aktivnosti; Mjerači razine glukoze u krvi; Mjerači krvnog tlaka; Analizatori tjelesne masti; Vage za mjerenje tjelesne težine; Dodatna oprema za alkotestere; Alkotesteri; Analizatori kolesterola; Uređaji za praćenje plodnosti i testovi ovulacije; Monitori otkucaja srca; Medicinski termometri; Uređaji za prenatalno praćenje otkucaja srca; Pulsni oksimetri
fr: Santé et beauté > Santé > Moniteurs biométriques: Moniteurs d’activité; Lecteurs de glycémie; Tensiomètres; Dispositifs d’analyse du tissu adipeux; Pèse-personnes; Accessoires pour éthylotests; Éthylotests; Analyseurs de cholestérol; Moniteurs de fertilité et tests d’ovulation; Moniteurs de fréquence cardiaque; Thermomètres à usage médical; Moniteurs cardiaques fœtaux; Oxymètres
zh-CN: 保健/美容/卫生/护理 > 医疗保健 > 生物体征监测器: 活动监视器; 血糖仪; 血压监测器; 体脂测量仪; 体重秤; 酒精测试仪配件; 酒精检测仪; 胆固醇检测仪; 生育和排卵期检测工具; 心率监测器; 体温计; 胎儿心率监测器; 血氧仪
pl: Zdrowie i uroda > Opieka zdrowotna > Monitory funkcji życiowych: Urządzenia do pomiaru aktywności fizycznej; Glukometry; Ciśnieniomierze; Urządzenia do pomiaru tkanki tłuszczowej; Wagi osobowe; Akcesoria do alkomatów; Alkomaty; Urządzenia do pomiaru cholesterolu; Monitory płodności i testy owulacyjne; Monitory tętna; Termometry medyczne; Monitory do badania pracy serca płodu; Pulsoksymetry
it: Salute e bellezza > Salute > Lettori biometrici: Monitor di attività; Misuratori glucosio nel sangue; Misuratori pressione sanguigna; Analizzatori grasso corporeo; Bilance pesapersone; Accessori dell'etilometro; Analizzatori alito; Analizzatori del colesterolo; Test di ovulazione e monitoraggio della fertilità; Monitor della frequenza cardiaca; Termometri medici; Rilevatori del battito cardiaco fetale; Pulsossimetri
fi: Terveys ja kauneus > Terveydenhoito > Biometriset monitorit: Aktiivisuusmittarit; Veren glukoosimittarit; Verenpainemittarit; Kehon rasvapitoisuuden analyysilaitteet; Henkilövaa'at; Alkometrilisävaruste; Alkometrit; Kolesterolimittarit; Hedelmällisyystestit ja ovulaatiotestit; Sykemittari; Lääketieteelliset kuumemittarit; Sikiön sykkeen seurantalaitteet; Pulssioksimetrit
tr: Sağlık ve Güzellik > Sağlık Bakım > Biyometrik Monitörler: Etkinlik İzleyiciler; Şeker Ölçüm Cihazları; Tansiyon Aletleri; Vücut Yağ Analiz Cihazları; Tartılar; Alkol Ölçer Aksesuarları; Alkolmetreler; Kolesterol Analiz Cihazları; Doğurganlık Monitörleri ve Ovulasyon Testleri; Kalp Atış Hızı Monitörleri; Medikal Termometreler; Doğum Öncesi Kalp Monitörleri; Nabız Oksimetreleri
el: Υγεία & ομορφιά > Φροντίδα υγείας > Βιομετρικές οθόνες: Οθόνες δραστηριότητας; Μετρητές γλυκόζης αίματος; Πιεσόμετρα; Δείκτες ανάλυσης λίπους σώματος; Ζυγαριές σωματικού βάρους; Αξεσουάρ αλκοολόμετρου; Οινοπνευματόμετρα; Αναλυτές χοληστερόλης; Μόνιτορ γονιμότητας και τεστ ωορρηξίας; Καρδιοσυχνόμετρα; Ιατρικά θερμόμετρα; Διατάξεις προγεννητικού ελέγχου των καρδιακών παλμών; Παλμικά οξύμετρα
en: Health & Beauty > Health Care > Biometric Monitors: Activity Monitors; Blood Glucose Meters; Blood Pressure Monitors; Body Fat Analyzers; Body Weight Scales; Breathalyzer Accessories; Breathalyzers; Cholesterol Analyzers; Fertility Monitors and Ovulation Tests; Heart Rate Monitors; Medical Thermometers; Prenatal Heart Rate Monitors; Pulse Oximeters